src/fst/phonology.xfscript
# Remove any unmarked, non-tone-bearing vowels (i.e., /i/) from the ends of
# prefixes that immediately precede vowel-initial TAMA chunks (e.g., di .
# is tł'áh -> d . is tł'áh).  This step makes it much easier to deal with
# the morphophonology that happens at the point where the inner prefixes meet
# the TAMA chunks.
define shortenDefaultPrefixes i -> 0 || _ "." ("^L") [á|a|à|í|i|ì|i2];

# Turn any instances of <i2> into plain /i/. (We use <i2> in some TAMA chunks
# to indicate an /i/ that maintains its mora when a prefix is joined to it,
# e.g., the first /i/ in isaà-/isiì- 1PL)
define cleanupMoraicI i2 -> i;

# Turn any remaining instances of <s2> into plain /s/.
define cleanup2PL s2 -> s;

# Remove middle and outer-prefix morphological boundary markers from the FST
# output.
define removeMiddleOuterBoundaryMarkers [ "_" -> 0 .o. "=" -> 0 ];

# Remove inner-prefix morphological boundary markers from the FST output.
define removeInnerBoundaryMarker "." -> 0;


#
# Compose all of the morphophonology together.
#

regex [ putLToneAfterInnerPrefixBoundaryMarker
.o. shortenDefaultPrefixes
.o. removeMiddleOuterBoundaryMarkers
.o. hToneSpreading
.o. encliticMidToHighTone
.o. distributivePlural1PLToneSandhi
.o. iAssimilation
.o. iTAMAAssimilation
.o. uTAMAAssimilation
.o. aTAMAAssimilation
.o. lToneLowering
.o. removeInnerBoundaryMarker
.o. cleanupMoraicI
.o. noThreeVowelSequences
.o. iAssimilation
.o. uGliding
.o. uDeletionBeforeO
.o. assimilationBefore2PL
.o. reduce2PLAfterVowel
.o. lInitialStemsSbjPl2
.o. cleanup2PL
.o. iDeletionBeforeOtherVowels
.o. slDissimilation
.o. y2InitialStemAfterS 
.o. aVowelAlternation
.o. n2FinalStems
.o. zhDevoicing 
.o. zDevoicing
#.o. ghDevoicing
.o. toneSandhi
];
